New York, session 2025-2026, S625.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 861 of the tax law, as amended by 2 section 2 of subpart C of part J of chapter 59 of the laws of 2023, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (c) The annual election must be made on or before [the due date of the 5 first estimated payment under section eight hundred sixty-four of this 6 article] September fifteenth and will take effect for the current taxa- 7 ble year. Only one election may be made during each calendar year. An 8 election made under this section is irrevocable after [the due date] 9 September fifteenth of the taxable year. 10 § 2. Subsection (b) of section 864 of the tax law, as added by section 11 1 of part C of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, paragraph 3 as amended by 12 chapter 555 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 13 (b) General. The estimated tax shall be paid as follows for an elect- 14 ing partnership and an electing S corporation: 15 (1) [The estimated tax shall be paid] For an election to be taxed 16 pursuant to this article that is made on or before March fifteenth of 17 the taxable year, the electing partnership or electing S corporation is 18 required to make estimated tax payments in four equal installments on 19 March fifteenth, June fifteenth, September fifteenth and December 20 fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year in which the due date EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02020-03-5 S. 625--A 2 1 of the return required by this article falls. The amount of each 2 installment shall be twenty-five percent of the required annual payment. 3 (2) [The amount of any required installment shall be twenty-five 4 percent of the required annual payment.] For an election to be taxed 5 pursuant to this article that is made after March fifteenth but before 6 June fifteenth in the taxable year, the electing partnership or electing 7 S corporation is required to make an estimated tax payment with its 8 election that represents twenty-five percent of the required annual 9 payment. The electing partnership or electing S corporation shall 10 further make payments on June fifteenth, September fifteenth, and Decem- 11 ber fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year in which the due 12 date of the return required by this article falls, which shall each 13 represent twenty-five percent of the required annual payment. 14 (3) For an election to be taxed pursuant to this article that is made 15 on or after June fifteenth but before September fifteenth in the taxable 16 year, the electing partnership or electing S corporation is required to 17 make an estimated tax payment with its election that represents fifty 18 percent of the required annual payment. The electing partnership or 19 electing S corporation shall further make payments on September 20 fifteenth and December fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year 21 in which the due date of the return required by this article falls, 22 which shall each represent twenty-five percent of the required annual 23 payment. 24 (4) For an election to be taxed pursuant to this article that is made 25 on September fifteenth in the taxable year, the electing partnership or 26 electing S corporation is required to make an estimated tax payment with 27 its election that represents seventy-five percent of the required annual 28 payment. The electing partnership or electing S corporation shall 29 further make a payment on December fifteenth in the calendar year prior 30 to the year in which the due date of the return required by this article 31 falls, which shall represent twenty-five percent of the required annual 32 payment. 33 [(3)] (5) Notwithstanding paragraph four of subsection (c) of section 34 six hundred eighty-five of this chapter, the required annual payment is 35 the lesser of: (A) ninety percent of the tax shown on the return for the 36 taxable year; or (B) one hundred percent of the tax shown on the return 37 of the electing partnership or electing S corporation for the preceding 38 taxable year. 39 § 3. Subsection (c) of section 868 of the tax law, as amended by 40 section 7 of subpart C of part J of chapter 59 of the laws of 2023, is 41 amended to read as follows: 42 (c) The annual election to be taxed pursuant to this article must be 43 made on or before [the due date of the first estimated payment under 44 section eight hundred sixty-four of this chapter] September fifteenth 45 and will take effect for the current taxable year. Only one election to 46 be taxed pursuant to this article may be made during each calendar year. 47 An election made under this section is irrevocable after [such due date] 48 September fifteenth of the taxable year. To the extent an election made 49 under section eight hundred sixty-one of this chapter is revoked or 50 otherwise invalidated an election made under this section is automat- 51 ically invalidated. 52 § 4. Subsection (b) of section 871 of the tax law, as added by section 53 1 of subpart B of part MM of chapter 59 of the laws of 2022, paragraph 3 54 as amended by chapter 555 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as 55 follows: S. 625--A 3 1 (b) General. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the 2 estimated tax shall be paid as follows for an electing city partnership 3 and an electing city resident S corporation: 4 (1) [The estimated tax shall be paid] For an election to be taxed 5 pursuant to this article that is made on or before March fifteenth in 6 the taxable year, the electing city partnership or electing city S 7 corporation is required to make estimated tax payments in four equal 8 installments on March fifteenth, June fifteenth, September fifteenth and 9 December fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year in which the 10 due date of the return required by this article falls. The amount of 11 each installment shall be twenty-five percent of the required annual 12 payment. 13 (2) [The amount of any required installment shall be twenty-five 14 percent of the required annual payment.] For an election to be taxed 15 pursuant to this article that is made after March fifteenth but before 16 June fifteenth in the taxable year, the electing city partnership or 17 electing city S corporation is required to make an estimated tax payment 18 with its election that represents twenty-five percent of the required 19 annual payment. The electing city partnership or electing city S corpo- 20 ration shall further make payments on June fifteenth, September 21 fifteenth, and December fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year 22 in which the due date of the return required by this article falls, 23 which shall each represent twenty-five percent of the required annual 24 payment. 25 (3) For an election to be taxed pursuant to this article that is made 26 after June fifteenth but before September fifteenth in the taxable year, 27 the electing city partnership or electing city S corporation is required 28 to make an estimated tax payment with its election that represents fifty 29 percent of the required annual payment. The electing city partnership or 30 electing city S corporation shall further make payments on September 31 fifteenth and December fifteenth in the calendar year prior to the year 32 in which the due date of the return required by this article falls, 33 which shall each represent twenty-five percent of the required annual 34 payment. 35 (4) For an election to be taxed pursuant to this article that is made 36 on September fifteenth in the taxable year, the electing city partner- 37 ship or electing city S corporation is required to make an estimated tax 38 payment with its election that represents seventy-five percent of the 39 required annual payment. The electing city partnership or electing city 40 S corporation shall further make a payment on December fifteenth in the 41 calendar year prior to the year in which the due date of the return 42 required by this article falls, which shall represent twenty-five 43 percent of the required annual payment. 44 [(3)] (5) Without regard to paragraph four of subsection (c) of 45 section six hundred eighty-five of this chapter, the required annual 46 payment is the lesser of: (A) ninety percent of the tax shown on the 47 return for the taxable year; or (B) one hundred percent of the tax shown 48 on the return of the electing city partnership or electing city resident 49 S corporation for the preceding taxable year. 50 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 51 years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.